Maryland, session 2025, HB1554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
11–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1554*

HOUSE BILL 1554
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(C–12) “NAICS” MEANS THE NORTH AMERICAN INDUSTRIAL
CLASSIFICATION SYSTEM, UNITED STATES MANUAL, 2022 EDITION, PUBLISHED BY
THE UNITED STATES OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT AND BUDGET.
[(c–12)] (C–13) “Permanent” means perpetual or for an indefinite or unspecified
length of time.
(l) (1) “Taxable price” means the value, in money, of the consideration of any
kind that is paid, delivered, payable, or deliverable by a buyer to a vendor in the
consummation and complete performance of a sale without deduction for any expense or
cost, including the cost of:
(i) any labor or service rendered;
(ii) any material used; or
(iii) any property, digital code, or digital product sold.
(3) “Taxable price” does not include:
(i) a charge that is made in connection with a sale and is stated as
a separate item of the consideration for:
1. a delivery, freight, or other transportation service for
delivery directly to the buyer by the vendor or by another person acting for the vendor,
unless the transportation service is a taxable service;
2. a finance charge, interest, or similar charge for credit
extended to the buyer;
3. a labor or service for application or installation UNLESS
THE LABOR OR SERVICE IS A TAXABLE SERVICE;
4. a mandatory gratuity or service charge in the nature of a
tip for serving food or beverage to a group of 10 or fewer individuals for consumption on the
premises of the vendor;
5. a professional service UNLESS THE SERVICE IS A
TAXABLE SERVICE;
6. a tax:

HOUSE BILL 1554 3
A. imposed by a county on the sale of coal, electricity, oil,
nuclear fuel assemblies, steam, or artificial or natural gas;
B. imposed under § 3–302(a) of the Natural Resources
Article, as a surcharge on electricity, and added to an electric bill;
C. imposed under §§ 6–201 through 6–203 of the Tax –
Property Article, on tangible personal property subject to a lease that is for an initial period
that exceeds 1 year and is noncancellable except for cause; or
D. imposed under § 4–102 of this article on the gross receipts
derived from an admissions and amusement charge;
7. any service for the operation of equipment used for the
production of audio, video, or film recordings UNLESS THE SERVICE IS A TAXABLE
SERVICE; or
8. reimbursement of incidental expenses paid to a third party
and incurred in connection with providing a taxable detective service;
(ii) the value of a used component or part (core value) received from
a purchaser of the following remanufactured truck parts:
1. an air brake system;
2. an engine;
3. a rear axle carrier; or
4. a transmission;
(iii) a charge for a nontaxable service that is made in connection with
a sale of a taxable communication service, even if the nontaxable charges are aggregated
with and not separately stated from the taxable charges for communications services, if the
vendor can reasonably identify charges not subject to tax from its books and records that
are kept in the regular course of business; or
(iv) a transportation network company impact fee imposed under §
10–408 of the Public Utilities Article.
(m) “Taxable service” means:
(1) fabrication, printing, or production of tangible personal property or a
digital product by special order;

HOUSE BILL 1554
(2) commercial cleaning or laundering of textiles for a buyer who is engaged
in a business that requires the recurring service of commercial cleaning or laundering of
the textiles;
(3) cleaning of a commercial or industrial building;
(4) cellular telephone or other mobile telecommunications service;
(5) “900”, “976”, “915”, and other “900”–type telecommunications service;
(6) custom calling service provided in connection with basic telephone
service;
(7) a telephone answering service;
(8) pay per view television service;
(9) credit reporting;
(10) a security service, including:
(i) a detective, guard, or armored car service; and
(ii) a security systems service;
(11) a transportation service for transmission, distribution, or delivery of
electricity or natural gas, if the sale or use of the electricity or natural gas is subject to the
sales and use tax;
(12) a prepaid telephone calling arrangement; [or]
(13) the privilege given to an individual under § 4–1102 of the Alcoholic
Beverages and Cannabis Article to consume wine that is not purchased from or provided
by a restaurant, club, or hotel; OR
(14) THE FOLLOWING SERVICES IF BOTH THE PROVIDER OF THE
SERVICE AND THE BUYER ARE BUSINESS ENTITIES:
(I) AN ACCOUNTING, BOOKKEEPING, BILLING, OR PAYROLL
SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS SECTOR 5412;
(II) AN OFFICE SUPPORT SERVICE, INCLUDING A SERVICE
DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS SECTOR 561110, 5614, OR 561910, OTHER THAN A
SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (6), (7), OR (9) OF THIS SUBSECTION;

HOUSE BILL 1554 5
(III) A PERMANENT OR TEMPORARY EMPLOYEE OR CONTRACTOR
PLACEMENT, INCLUDING A SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS SECTOR 5613;
(IV) A DATA OR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICE
DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS SECTOR 518, 519, OR 5415;
(V) A SYSTEM SOFTWARE OR APPLICATION SOFTWARE
PUBLISHING SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS SECTOR 5415;
(VI) A CONSULTING SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS
SECTOR 5416;
(VII) AN EXPERIMENTAL DEVELOPMENT SERVICE DESCRIBED
UNDER NAICS SECTOR 5417;
(VIII) A PHOTOGRAPHY, DESIGN, OR PRINTING SERVICE,
INCLUDING A SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS SECTOR 541420, 541430, OR
541490;
(IX) A LOBBYING, PUBLIC RELATIONS, OR MARKETING SERVICE
DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS SECTOR 5418;
(X) A LANDSCAPING AND NONRESIDENTIAL BUILDING OR
PROPERTY MAINTENANCE SERVICE, INCLUDING A SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER
NAICS SECTOR 561210, 5616, OR 5617, OTHER THAN A SERVICE DESCRIBED
UNDER ITEM (3) OR (10) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(XI) A HEAVY TRUCK OR BUS REPAIR SERVICE DESCRIBED
UNDER NAICS SECTOR 8111;
(XII) A REPAIR SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS SECTOR
8112 OR 8113;
(XIII) A FINANCIAL PLANNING OR TAX PREPARATION SERVICE
DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS SECTOR 5239 OR 5412;
(XIV) AN APPRAISAL SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS
SECTOR 541990;
(XV) A SPORTS OR PERFORMING ARTS ADVERTISING SERVICE;
OR

HOUSE BILL 1554
(XVI) A VALET OR PARKING SERVICE DESCRIBED UNDER NAICS
SECTOR 812930, OTHER THAN A PUBLIC PARKING GARAGE.
11–104.
(L) (1) THE SALES AND USE TAX FOR A SALE OF A TAXABLE SERVICE
DESCRIBED UNDER § 11–101(M)(14) OF THIS SUBTITLE IS 2.5% OF THE TAXABLE
PRICE.
(2) IF A DIFFERENT RATE FROM THE RATE SPECIFIED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION COULD BE APPLIED TO A SALE OR USE OF
TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY, A DIGITAL CODE, A DIGITAL PRODUCT, OR A
TAXABLE SERVICE, THE HIGHER RATE SHALL APPLY TO THE SALE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.